Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF638.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2624HV (3) 91 dg/ko H.F. 638 Section 1. Section 232.102, subsection 1, paragraph c, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 c. (1) A court shall not order placement of a child in a 3 category identified in paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (2), (3), 4 (4), or (5) without a specific finding that placement with 5 an adult relative is not in the childâs best interests and 6 providing reasons for the courtâs finding. 7 (2) Notwithstanding any provision under this subsection 8 to the contrary, if the court finds, during the dispositional 9 hearing, that the child has been placed with an individual 10 licensed under chapter 237 to provide foster care for at least 11 nine months immediately preceding the dispositional hearing, 12 the court shall not order placement of a child in a category 13 identified in paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (1), (2), or (3), 14 without a specific finding that such placement is in the 15 childâs best interests and providing reasons for the courtâs 16 findings. 17 Sec. 2. DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES ââ CHILD 18 PROTECTIVE SERVICES. 19 1. There is appropriated from the general fund of the state 20 to the department of health and human services for the fiscal 21 year beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2026, the 22 following amount, or so much thereof as is necessary, to be 23 used for the purposes designated: 24 To employ five individuals with the department to perform 25 child protective services duties: 26 . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . $ 275,000 27 2. a. The department of health and human services shall 28 assign each individual employed through the appropriation under 29 subsection 1 to a separate child protective services area. 30 b. Each employee shall be responsible for performing the 31 identification and notice duties required under section 232.84 32 for the service area to which the employee was assigned. 33 c. Each employee shall utilize, to the extent practicable, 34 national models and practice standards to improve outcomes 35 -1- LSB 2624HV (3) 91 dg/ko 1/ 2 H.F. 638 under the requirements of section 232.84. 1